Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Chapter 7 Irrigation Districts

Cross references. —

As to taxation of property of irrigation districts, see §

41-3-773

.

As to exemption of property owned by state, drainage districts, irrigation districts, park districts, water districts or other governmental agencies in assessment and levy in connection with water conservancy districts, see §

41-3-778

.

As to procedure upon application for permit for appropriation of water, see §§

41-4-501

through

41-4-512

,

41-4-514

through

41-4-517

.

As to irrigation generally, see ch. 5 of this title.

As to irrigation and drainage districts generally, see ch. 6 of this title.

For constitutional provisions relative to irrigation and water rights generally, Wyo. Const., art. 8, §§ 1 through 5.

For provision prohibiting loans on credit or donations by state or any political subdivision thereof and requiring two-thirds vote of people for works of internal improvement, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 6.

As to construction and improvement of works for conservation and utilization of water, see Wyo. Const., art. 16, § 10.

For duty of stock drover to prevent his livestock from trespassing upon property of another or from injuring any irrigation ditch or public works, see §

11-20-119

.

As to creation of livestock districts within irrigation district, see §§

11-33-101

through

11-33-109

.

For duty of companies, corporations, etc., operating or maintaining ditches, canals or watercourses, not being a natural stream, for irrigation and other purposes, to construct and maintain bridges at road crossings, see §

24-1-113

.

As to permitting or allowing water to be dammed up for irrigation or mining ditches so as to overflow on public roads or highways, or undermine, weaken or damage any bridge, etc., see §

24-1-116

.

As to public health and safety relative to water, see title 35.

As to public lands generally, see title 36.

As to when county treasurers to pay over funds to treasurer of each irrigation district, drainage district, etc., see §

39-13-111

.